Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1812
Hedges and trees; trimming; duties of landowners.

Each landowner in this state upon whose land there is standing or growing any osage orange, willow or locust hedge fence, trees, or undergrowth, bordering the public roads, when such fence, trees, or undergrowth become a public nuisance to travel on the roads, or obstruct the view at or near railroad crossings, crossroads or abrupt turns in the road, shall keep the same trimmed not less than once a year by cutting back to within four feet of the ground, excepting trees, which shall be trimmed from the ground up eight feet, and the trimmings so cut shall be burned or removed from the road right-of-way within ten days after each cutting.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. V, § 12, p. 555.